hu: Reszelő kialakítása: Doboz; Hengerdob; Elektromos; Lapos, kézi; Mandolintartozék; Mikrosík; Különböző felületű torony; Ráspoly; Forgó; Egyéb
es: Diseño del rallador: Caja; Tambor cilíndrico; Eléctrico; Dispositivo portátil plano; Mandolina; Microplano; Caja con cuatro caras; Raspar; Giratoria; Otros
zh-CN: 刨丝器设计: 盒式; 滚筒式; 电动式; 平板手持式; 多功能附件; 微平面; 多面塔式; 锉刀式; 旋转式; 其他
pt-BR: Design do ralador: Caixa; Tambor cilíndrico; Elétrica; Portátil plano; Acessório Mandoline; Microplano; Torre multissuperfície; Ralador grosso; Rotativo; Outro
ru: Конструкция терки: Четырехгранная; Цилиндрический барабан; Электрическая; Плоский ручной; Насадка Mandoline; Microplane; Башня с несколькими поверхностями; Рашпиль; Роторная; Другая
it: Design della grattugia: Scatola; Tamburo del cilindro; Elettrico; Palmare piatto; Accessorio a mandolina; Microplane; Torre multisuperficie; Raspa; A rotazione; Altro
nl: Ontwerp van rasp: Box; Cilindertrommel; Elektrisch; Platte handrasp; Mandoline-opzetstuk; Microplane; Blokrasp; Rasp; Roterend; Overig
sv: Design för rivjärn: Låda; Cylindertrumma; Elektrisk; Platt handhållen; Mandoline; Mikroplan; Multi-yta torn; Rasp; Roterande; Övrigt
bg-BG: Дизайн на рендето: Кутия; Цилиндричен барабан; Електрически; Плоско ръчно; Приставка за Мандолина; Microplane; Многофункционални ренде; Ситно; Ротационно; Друго
th: การออกแบบอุปกรณ์ขูด: กล่อง; แบบดรัมทรงกระบอก; ไฟฟ้า; แบบแบนใช้มือถือ; หัวสไลซ์แบบแมนโดลิน; ที่ขูดละเอียดพิเศษ; ที่ขูดทรงหอแบบหลายพื้นผิว; ที่ขูดหยาบ; โรตารี; อื่นๆ
fi: Raastimen muotoilu: Laatikkomallinen; Sylinterirumpu; Sähkökäyttöinen; Litteä kädessä pidettävä; Mandoliinikiinnitys; Mikro; Monipintainen torni; Raspi; Pyörivä; Muu
nb: Rivjerndesign: Eske; Sylindertrommel; Elektrisk; Flat håndholdt; Mandolin-tilbehør; Mikroplan; Multi-overflate tårn; Rasp; Roterende; Annet
zh-TW: 刨絲器設計: 箱型; 圓筒狀; 電動式; 扁平手持式; Mandoline 附件; 小型; 多表面塔式; 銼式; 旋轉式; 其他
lt-LT: Tarkos dizainas: Dėžutė; Cilindro būgnas; Elektrinis; Plokščias delninis; Mandoline priedas; Microplane tipo; Daugiapaviršinis bokštas; Dildės tipo; Rotacinis; Kita
ro-RO: Designul răzătoarei: Tip cutie; Tambur cilindric; Electric; Plat manual; Accesoriu mandolină; Microplan; Turn multifață; Raspă; Rotativ; Altele
cs: Design struhadla: Čtyřhranné; Bubnové; Elektrické; Ploché ruční; Nástavec s mandolínou; Microplane; Věžové s několika plochami; Ve stylu rašple; Rotační; Jiné
hr-HR: Dizajn ribeža: Kutija; Cilindrični bubanj; Električna; Plosnati ručni; Nastavak za mandolinu; Microplane; Višenamjenskis stožasti; Fini; Rotacijska; Ostalo
pl: Konstrukcja tarki: Pudełkowe; Bęben cylindryczny; Elektryczne; Płaska ręczna; Nakładka do mandoliny; Microplane; Wieżowa wielofunkcyjna; Zdzierak; Obrotowe; Pozostałe
sk-SK: Dizajn strúhadla: Škatuľa; Valcovitý bubon; Elektrický; Plochý ručný; Nadstavec Mandoline; Strúhadlo Microplane; Viacstenné strúhadlo; Rašpľa; Rotačný; Iné
ja: おろし金のデザイン: ボックス; シリンダードラム; 電気; フラットハンドヘルド; マンドリンアタッチメント; マイクロプレーン; マルチサーフェスタワー; やすり; ロータリー; その他
fr: Conception de la râpe: Boîte; Tambour cylindrique; Électrique; Râpe plate à main; Accessoire pour mandoline; Microplane; Tour multi-surfaces; Râpe; Rotatif; Autre
ko: 강판 디자인: 상자; 실린더 드럼; 전자식; 평면 핸드헬드; 만돌린 어태치먼트; 마이크로플레인; 다면 타워; 라스프; 회전; 기타
tr: Rende tasarımı: Kutu; Silindir tambur; Elektrikli; Düz el tipi; Mandoline bağlantısı; Mikroplan; Çok yüzeyli kule; Rasp rende; Döner; Diğer
sl-SI: Zasnova strgalnika: Škatla; Boben cilindra; Električna; Ploski ročni; Priključek Mandoline; Mikroravnina; Večpovršinski stolp; Rašpa; Krožna; Druga
vi: Thiết kế dụng cụ bào: Hộp; Thùng hình trụ; Điện; Thiết kế cầm tay phẳng; Phụ kiện bàn bào đa năng; Bàn bào mịn; Tháp bào đa mặt; Bào thô; Xoay; Khác
pt-PT: Design do ralador: Caixa; Tambor cilíndrico; Elétrico; Portátil plano; Acessório Mandolina; Microplano; Torre multisuperfície; Raspador; Rotativo; Outro
da: Rivejerns design: Boks; Cylindertromle; Elektrisk; Flad håndholdt; Mandolintilbehør; Microplane; Tårn med flere overflader; Rasp; Roterende; Andet
de: Reibendesign: Kasten; Zylindertrommel; Elektrisch; Flache Handreibe; Mandolinenaufsatz; Mikroplane; Vierkantreibe; Raspel; Rotierend; Sonstiges
el: Σχεδιασμός τρίφτη: Τύπου κουτιού; Κυλινδρικό τύμπανο; Ηλεκτρική; Επίπεδος χειρός; Εξάρτημα μαντολίνου; Microplane; Πύργος πολλαπλών επιφανειών; Ράσπα; Περιστροφική; Άλλο
en: Grater design: Box; Cylinder drum; Electric; Flat handheld; Mandoline attachment; Microplane; Multi-surface tower; Rasp; Rotary; Other